Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0253.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1f. (1) A tenant in a metered or sub-metered rental unit that is not multifamily rental property that is serviced by a single water meter may request that a provider send a copy of the water and sewer bill to both the landlord and the tenant. (2) A landlord shall not interfere with, or discriminate or retaliate against, a tenant that makes a request under subsection (1). For purposes of this subsection, interference with, or discrimination or retaliation against, a tenant includes, but is not limited to, shutting off the tenant's access to water in the tenant's rental unit, refusing to renew the tenant's lease, unlawfully evicting the tenant because the tenant made a request under subsection (1), or increasing the tenant's rental payment solely because the tenant exercised the tenant's rights under this section. (3) A rental agreement entered into, renewed, or renegotiated after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section must contain the requirements of this section. (4) If this section conflicts with a federal law regulating subsidized housing, the federal law prevails. (5) This section applies only to a lease, including a lease renewed each month as an estate at will in accordance with section 34 of 1846 RS 66, MCL 554.134, entered into, renewed, or renegotiated after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section, in accordance with the constitutional prohibition against impairments of contract as provided by section 10 of article I of the state constitution of 1963. (6) As used in this section, "provider" means a community water supply that is publicly or privately owned and that provides retail water service in this state.